North Carolina, session 2025, HB833.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Title. – This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Food
Refrigeration Expansion for Safe Home-processing (FRESH) Act."
SECTION 2.(a) Program Expansion. – The Department of Agriculture and
Consumer Services (hereinafter, the "Department") shall expand its Home Processor Program to
authorize the production and sale by program participants of refrigerated or frozen food products,
and bakery products with cream or cream cheese fillings, including cheesecakes.
SECTION 2.(b) Rulemaking. – The Department may adopt temporary rules
necessary to implement subsection (a) of this section. Temporary rules adopted pursuant to this
section shall remain in effect until permanent rules that replace the temporary rules become
effective. The expanded Home Processor Program remains subject to applicable food safety laws
and inspections under Article 12 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H833-v-1*